Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:(1) The student achievement council and institutions of higher education that have behavioral health programs shall collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to establish standards for behavioral health graduates to satisfy supervision requirements for licensing and certification while serving as behavioral health professionals in elementary and secondary public schools.(2) For purposes of this section:(a) "Behavioral health professionals" includes licensed advanced and independent clinical social workers, licensed marriage and family therapists, and mental health counselors.(b) "Institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 28B.10.016.(c) "Elementary and secondary public schools" has the same meaning as "public schools" as provided in RCW 28A.150.010.--- END ---